Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1103
Election contest; appointment of court official; powers and duties; compensation.

Upon the presentation of a petition contesting an election and the answer to such petition, if any, the court shall appoint an official of the court to take the testimony of the petitioner and the person whose election is contested at such times and places as the court directs. The court order shall specify the points and facts in regard to which the testimony is to be taken and the time when the official shall make his or her report to the court. The court shall fix the compensation of the official to be taxed as part of the costs. The official shall have the power to administer oaths and take depositions, to compel the attendance of witnesses by summons and attachment, to require such witnesses to testify, and to certify such testimony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 346.

Delegation of authority under this section could not operate to expand the original jurisdiction of the Supreme Court. Sorensen v. Swanson, 181 Neb. 205, 147 N.W.2d 620 (1967).